Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20258-3041
Customer service.

All controllable electronic record kiosk operators performing business in the state shall, at a minimum, provide live customer service on Monday through Friday between the hours of 7:00 a.m. and 9:00 p.m. via a toll-free telephone number. The telephone number shall be displayed on the controllable electronic record kiosk or the kiosk screens.

Laws 2025, LB609, § 10.